Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5668XS (2) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2050 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. a. A member of the general assembly 3 may subtract unreimbursed mileage at the same amount per 4 mile as determined by the director of the department of 5 administrative services in section 8A.363, subsection 1, or by 6 the established policies for expenses referenced in section 7 8A.363, subsection 2, if applicable, when performing services 8 on behalf of constituents. 9 b. This subsection does not apply to any of the following 10 circumstances: 11 (1) Mileage incurred on legislative days during a 12 legislative session under section 2.10, subsection 1. 13 (2) Mileage incurred on legislative days during a special 14 session under section 2.10, subsection 6. 15 (3) Mileage incurred for campaign functions. 16 c. As used in this subsection: 17 (1) âCampaign functionâ means the same as defined in section 18 68A.102. 19 (2) âLegislative dayâ means the same as defined in section 20 162(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. 21 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 22 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 23 or after that date. 24